Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 25001 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
It is the public policy of this state to protect those persons
disclosing wrongdoing by state agencies, political subdivisions,
public trusts, and those in the private sector who have supervisory
or other controls over persons in their workplace who report
wrongdoing without fear or threat of retaliation. Such persons
reporting wrongdoing shall be known as "whistleblowers".


Req. No. 10099 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 25002 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "retaliation" means any threat or
action to terminate, demote, refusal to promote, threaten or
intimidate a whistleblower who reports wrongdoing.
B. Any public official and/or employee, employer or employee
who supervises a whistleblower that engages in an action or activity
that violated public policy as defined in Section 1 of this act for
reporting wrongdoing shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
incarceration for up to one (1) year and a Five Thousand Dollar
($5,000.00) fine, and liable civilly for all economic, emotional and
mental anguish directly caused thereby together with punitive
damages, and such person shall be prohibited from holding any public
office or employment.
C. Any whistleblower who successfully prosecutes an action
under this act shall be entitled to a reasonable attorney fee
together with costs.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10099 AQH 11/05/24



Req. No. 10099 Page 2